Washington statutes.
RCW 35.45.160

Consolidated local improvement districts—Authorized—Purpose.

For the purpose of issuing bonds only, the governing body of any municipality may authorize the establishment of consolidated local improvement districts. The local improvements within such consolidated districts need not be adjoining, vicinal or neighboring. If the governing body orders the creation of such consolidated local improvement districts, the moneys received from the installment payment of the principal of and interest on assessments levied within original local assessment districts shall be deposited in a consolidated local improvement district bond redemption fund to be used to redeem outstanding consolidated local improvement district bonds.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 44 s 3.]